California, session 20252026, AB1858.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 12 (commencing with Section 89298) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 55 of Division 8 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 12. California State University: Joint Associate’s Degree Pilot Program89298. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California State University: Joint Associate’s Degree Pilot Program.89298.1. As used in this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Eligible student” means a former student who has met the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 89298.2.(b) “Former student” means a student who is no longer enrolled at a California State University campus.(c) “Postsecondary educational institution” means a campus or district of the California Community Colleges or an independent institution of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, that awards associate degrees.89298.2. (a) Notwithstanding Section 66010.4, the Chancellor of the California State University shall establish a pilot program to offer an associate degree that is jointly awarded by the California State University and a postsecondary educational institution to former students who meet both of the following requirements:(1) The former student successfully completed coursework equivalent to the requirements for an associate degree.(2) The former student has not previously earned an associate degree from a postsecondary educational institution.(b) Notwithstanding Section 66010.4, the pilot program shall include all of the following that is mutually agreed upon by the California State University and a postsecondary educational institution:(1) The establishment of an associate degree in general education studies, which shall be the official name of an associate degree conferred pursuant to this article. or, if applicable, an associate degree with an area of emphasis that is consistent with the former student’s completed coursework.(2) A process to jointly confer the an associate degree established pursuant to paragraph (1) between a California State University campus and a postsecondary educational institution.(3) A process for identifying eligible former students.(4) A mechanism for verifying an eligible former student’s completion of the requirements for the an associate degree established pursuant to paragraph (1).(c) An associate degree awarded pursuant to this section shall be awarded at no cost to the former student.(d) The California State University, Long Beach, shall participate in the pilot program. The pilot program may include up to four additional California State University campuses, as determined by the Chancellor of the California State University.(e) (1) On or before January 1, 2032, the Chancellor of the California State University shall submit a report to the Legislature evaluating the effectiveness of the pilot program at the participating California State University campuses. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the number of associate degrees awarded pursuant to this article disaggregated by student demographics, outcomes, and legislative recommendations.(2) A report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(f) Implementation of the pilot program shall commence on or before July 1, 2027.89298.3. (a) This article shall only become operative upon an appropriation by the Legislature for its purposes.(b) This article shall become inoperative on June 30, 2032, and, as of January 1, 2033, is repealed.